Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 4 Dower and Jointure [Repealed.]

33-4-1 — 33-4-34.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 264, § 1-9, 11-31; C.P.A. 1905, § 1161, 1162, 1163; G.L. 1909, ch. 329, § 1-30; G.L. 1923, ch. 380, § 1-3; P.L.1929, ch. 1317, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 418, § 1-30, 31; P.L. 1941, ch. 1004, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 24, effective July 5, 1995.